Vermont, session 2025-2026, H587.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 1010 is amended to read:
§ 1010. MEMBERS OF CERTAIN BOARDS
(a) Except for those members serving ex officio or otherwise regularly
employed by the State, the members of the following boards shall be entitled to
receive per diem compensation:
* * *
(b)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, members of
professional or occupational licensing boards or commissions, advisory boards
or commissions, appeals boards, promotional boards, interstate boards,
VT LEG #386347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.587
2026 Page 2 of 5
supervisory boards and councils, or any other boards, commissions, or similar
entities that are not listed in subsection (a) of this section but are otherwise
entitled by act of the General Assembly to receive per diem compensation shall
be entitled to receive per diem compensation for each day time devoted to
official duties.
(2) “Per diem compensation” means the amount of compensation to
which a member of a statutory board or commission is entitled for:
(A) attendance at a regular or special meeting of such board or
commission or any committee thereof; or
(B) performance of other duties directly related to the efficient
conduct of necessary board business as assigned and approved by the
chairperson, provided that payment for such duties shall be at the per diem rate
prorated for actual time spent performing duties. Proration shall be calculated
based on an eight-hour day. Under no circumstances shall the daily payment
exceed the per diem amount.
(c) The members of the boards and commissions, including those members
serving ex officio or otherwise regularly employed by the State, shall be
entitled to receive their actual and necessary expenses when away from home
or office upon their official duties.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, a member shall not be entitled to receive State per diem compensation
VT LEG #386347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.587
2026 Page 3 of 5
for any meeting or other official duty for which specific compensation is
provided by another source.
(e) Per diem compensation authorized under this section for members of
boards, commissions, councils, and committees and all other management,
policymaking, or advisory bodies, including temporary study commissions, of
the Executive Branch, whether appointed by the Governor or not, shall be not
less than $50.00 per day or the most current Vermont livable wage per hour
rate established pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 526, whichever is more, and shall be
approved pursuant to this subsection.
(1) The annual budget report of the Governor submitted to the General
Assembly as required by section 306 of this title shall contain a separate
schedule, by entity, that provides the per diem compensation rate established
for the current fiscal year and the per diem rate proposed for the next fiscal
year of any per diem that will be increased from its current fiscal year rate.
This schedule shall also provide, by entity, the total per diem amounts paid and
total expenses reimbursed for all members of the entity in the most recently
ended fiscal year. Prior to submitting this schedule, the Governor shall consult
with each elective officer or State officer who administers per diems that are
not funded by the General Fund.
(2) In the annual budget documentation submitted to the House and
Senate Committees on Appropriations, any agency or department that
VT LEG #386347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.587
2026 Page 4 of 5
administers funds for a board, commission, council, and committee and all
other management, policymaking, or advisory bodies, including temporary
study commissions, shall provide a list of the entities and the current and
projected per diem rate and expense reimbursement for each entity. The
agency or department shall include within its annual budget documentation the
justification for any current or projected per diem rate that is greater than
$50.00 or the most current Vermont livable wage per hour rate established
pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 526, including the justification for authorizing a per
diem rate of greater than $50.00 for a board, commission, council, or
committee created by executive order pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.
(f) [Repealed.]
(g) The Governor may authorize per diem compensation and expense
reimbursement in accordance with this section for members of boards,
commissions, councils, and committees and all other management,
policymaking, or advisory bodies, including temporary study commissions,
created by executive order. Per diems and expense reimbursement authorized
under this subsection shall be effective as of the effective date of the executive
order but shall subsequently be reviewed and approved pursuant to the
approval process of subsection (e) of this section during the next budgetary
cycle.
VT LEG #386347 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.587
2026 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386347 v.1